Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-1912
Inspector; duties; assistants.

The city or village plumbing inspector shall inspect all plumbing work in process of construction, alteration, or repair within the inspector's respective jurisdiction, and for which a permit either has or has not been granted, and shall report to the plumbing board all violations of any law, ordinance, or rule or regulation of the plumbing board, in connection with the plumbing work being done, and shall perform such other appropriate duties as may be required of such inspector by the plumbing board. If necessary, the mayor, by the consent of the city council, the city manager, or the chairperson of the village board of trustees, shall employ one or more assistant inspectors, who shall be licensed plumbers, to assist in the performance of the duties of the plumbing inspector.

Laws 1901, c. 21, § 10, p. 324;

R.S.1913, § 5285;

C.S 1922, § 4508;

C.S.1929, § 19-312;

R.S.1943, § 19-312;

Laws 1961, c. 57, § 10, p. 214;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 127.
August 28, 2021